Utah statutes.
17-36-21.   Expenditure limitation.
No officer or employee of a county shall make any expenditure or encumbrance
in excess of the total appropriation for any department. Any obligation that
is contracted by any such officer or employee in excess of the total
departmental appropriation is the personal obligation of the officer or
employee and is unenforceable against the county.
